Utah statutes.
10-3-1310.   Penalties for violation -- Dismissal from employment or removal
from office.
In addition to any penalty contained in any other provision of law, any person
who knowingly and intentionally violates this part, with the exception of
Sections 10-3-1306, 10-3-1307, 10-3-1308, and 10-3-1309, shall be dismissed
from employment or removed from office and is guilty of:
(1)  a felony of the second degree if the total value of the compensation,
conflict of interest, or assistance exceeds $1,000;
(2)  a felony of the third degree if:
(a)  the total value of the compensation, conflict of interest, or assistance
is more than $250 but not more than $1,000; or
(b)  the elected or appointed officer or municipal employee has been twice
before convicted of violation of this chapter and the value of the conflict of
interest, compensation, or assistance was $250 or less;
(3)  a class A misdemeanor if the value of the compensation or assistance was
more than $100 but does not exceed $250; or
(4)  a class B misdemeanor if the value of the compensation or assistance was
$100 or less.
